Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.350

Certificate of registration—Application—Qualifications.

(1) A certificate of registration shall be granted by the director to all qualified applicants who are certified by the board as having passed the required examination and as having given satisfactory proof of completion of the required experience.

(2) Applications for examination shall be filed as the board prescribes by rule. The application and examination fees shall be determined by the director under RCW 43.24.086.

(3) An applicant for registration as an architect shall be of a good moral character, at least eighteen years of age, and shall possess one of the following qualifications:

(a) Have an accredited architectural degree and complete a structured training program approved by the board; or

(b) Have a high school diploma or equivalent and at least eight years of practical architectural work experience, including the completion of a structured training program under the direct supervision of an architect as determined by the board. At least three of the years of required experience outside of the structured training program must be under the direct supervision of an architect. This work experience may include designing buildings as a principal activity and postsecondary education as determined by the board. The board may approve up to four years of practical architectural work experience for postsecondary education courses in architecture, architectural technology, or a related field, as determined by the board, including courses completed in a community or technical college if the courses are equivalent to courses in an accredited architectural degree program.

[ 2019 c 67 s 3; 2010 c 129 s 5; 1997 c 169 s 1; 1993 c 475 s 2; 1993 c 475 s 1; 1985 c 37 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intern training program enrollment—2010 c 129 s 5: "Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1, 2012, and all persons enrolled in an intern training program as approved by the board before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of enrollment in the program." [ 2010 c 129 s 12.]

Effective date—1997 c 169 s 1: "Section 1 of this act takes effect July 29, 2001." [ 1997 c 169 s 2.]

Effective date—1993 c 475 s 2: "Section 2 of this act shall take effect July 29, 2001." [ 1993 c 475 s 3.]